California statutes. Public Contract Code
 recycled water, advanced treated water, or supporting facilities using the progressive design-build construction procurement process described in this chapter.

(e) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and the individuals and other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team. Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum payment amount agreed upon by the local agency and the design-build entity for the design-build entity to finish all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(g) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or special district authorized by law to provide for the production, storage, supply, treatment, or distribution of any water from any source.

(h) “Progressive design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity that is selected through a qualifications-based selection at the earliest feasible stage of the project.

(i) “Qualifications-based selection” means the process by which the local agency solicits for services from the design-build entities and that price is not the sole factor as the basis of award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.

A local agency may procure progressive design-build contracts and use the progressive design-build contracting process described in this chapter for up to 15 public works projects in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for each project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.5.

A local agency entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the local agency relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.

The procurement process for progressive design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) The local agency shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to select a design-build entity to execute the project. The request for qualifications shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(1) Documentation of the size, type, and desired design character of the project and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the local agency’s needs, including the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate the design-build entity’s
 qualifications, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and any 
 other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, and all other non-price-related factors. The local agency may require that a preliminary cost estimate be included in the design-build entities’ responses and consider those costs in evaluating the statements of qualifications.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for qualifications.

(4) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the local
 agency. In preparing the standard template, the local agency may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The template shall require the following information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the entity’s shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of the statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or have demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that
 proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history
 and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(b) (1) A design-build entity shall not be evaluated for selection 
 unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the local agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if one or more of the following requirements are met:

(A) The local agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the local agency before January 1, 2023.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(c) At the close of the solicitation period, the local agency shall review the submissions. The local agency may evaluate submissions based solely upon the information provided in each design-build
 entity’s statement of qualifications. The local agency may also interview some or all of the design-build entities to further evaluate their qualifications for the project.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the local agency shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the local agency’s contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.1.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the local agency, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The local agency shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.2.

(a) After selecting a design-build entity based upon qualifications, the local agency may enter into a contract and direct the design-build entity to begin design and preconstruction activities sufficient to establish a guaranteed maximum price for the project.

(b) (1) Upon agreement of the guaranteed maximum price for the project, the local agency, at its sole and absolute discretion, may amend its contract with the design build entity to contract for the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project, consistent with the guaranteed maximum price. In the event that there are unforeseen
 site conditions, the local agency may amend its contract with the design build entity accordingly and consistent with the guaranteed maximum price, to enable the entity to complete the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(2) If the cost for completing all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project exceed the guaranteed maximum price, the costs exceeding the guaranteed maximum price shall be the responsibility of the design-build entity. If the cost for these activities are less than the guaranteed maximum price, the design-build
 entity shall not be entitled to the difference between the cost and the guaranteed maximum price unless there is a prior written agreement concerning the sharing of these funds. For purposes of this section, cost shall include the design build entity’s direct costs, general conditions, overhead, and fee.

(c) (1) If the local agency and the design-build entity do not reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price, or the local agency otherwise elects not to amend the design-build entity’s contract to complete the remaining work, the local agency may solicit proposals to complete the project from firms that submitted 
 statements of qualifications pursuant to Section 22172. The local agency may also, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the city, county, city and county, or special district, as applicable, to do so, formally solicit proposals from other design-build entities, and contract award shall be made on a best value basis.

(2) The design professionals responsible for performing design services on behalf of a design build entity that has been replaced pursuant to paragraph (1) shall have sole liability for their design errors and omissions, provided the local agency elects to use their complete and stamped designs with subsequent design build entities or licensed contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.3.

(a) The local agency, in each design-build request for qualifications, may identify specific types of subcontractors that shall be included in the design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the statement of qualifications shall be afforded the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, except for those construction subcontractors listed in the statement of qualifications, the design-build entity shall proceed as listed in this subdivision in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the
 contract price allocable to construction work for projects with a contract value of greater than or equal to ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the local agency, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract on a best value basis. The process may include prequalification or short-listing.

(c) Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this
 subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(d) A construction subcontractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code that provides design services used on a project authorized by this chapter shall not be subject to any liability arising from their design if the construction subcontract for that design is not performed by that subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.4.

(a) If the local agency elects to award a project pursuant to this chapter, retention proceeds withheld by the local agency from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation. Work performed to establish the guaranteed maximum price shall not be subject to retention.

(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build
 entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the design-build entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required, and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, no later than January 1, 2028, a local agency that uses the progressive design-build process pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the progressive design-build process.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the project or projects awarded using the progressive design-build process.

(2) The contract award amounts.

(3) The design-build entities awarded the project or projects.

(4) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(5) A description of the prequalification process.

(6) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that provided design services, but did not meet the target price for their scope of work, and therefore did not perform construction services on that project.

(7) Whether or not any portion of a design prepared by the specialty subcontractor
 that did not perform the construction work for that design was used by the local agency.

(8) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a small business, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(9) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a microbusiness, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(10) If a project awarded under this chapter has been completed, an assessment of the project performance, including, but not limited to, a summary of any delays or cost increases.

(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22173.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22174.)
-------------------------------------------

22174.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 991)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 4.1, commencing with Section 22170.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Civic Openness in Negotiations  [22175. - 22178.]

22175.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Civic Reporting Openness in Negotiations Efficiency Act, or CRONEY.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22176.

As used in this chapter, “civic openness in negotiations ordinance” or “COIN ordinance” means an ordinance adopted by a city, county, city and county, or special district that requires any of the following as a part of any collective bargaining process undertaken pursuant to the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code):

(a) The preparation of an independent economic analysis describing the fiscal costs of benefit and pay components currently provided to members of a recognized employee organization, as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code.

(b) The completion of the independent economic analysis prior to the presentation of an opening proposal by the public employer.

(c) Availability for review by the public of the independent economic analysis before presentation of an opening proposal by the public employer.

(d) Updating of the independent economic analysis to reflect the annual or cumulative costs of each proposal made by the public employer or recognized employee organization.

(e) Updating of the independent economic analysis to reflect any absolute amount or change from the current actuarially computed unfunded liability associated with the pension or postretirement health benefits.

(f) The report from a closed session of a meeting of the public employer’s governing body of offers, counteroffers, or supposals made by the public employer or the recognized employee organization and communicated during that closed session.

(g) The report from a closed session of a meeting of the public employer’s governing body of any list of names of persons in attendance during any negotiations session, the date of the session, the length of the session, the location of the session, or pertinent facts regarding the negotiations that occurred during a session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

(a) This chapter applies only to a city, county, city and county, or special district that has adopted a COIN ordinance, which is effective and operative. This chapter shall not apply if the city, county, city and county, or special district suspends, repeals, or revokes its COIN ordinance. 

(b) This chapter shall not apply to a contract if the contract is required to respond to, recover from, or mitigate the effects of any of the following:

(1) A temporary public safety emergency declared by the chief law enforcement officer of a city, county, city and county, or special district.

(2) A state of war emergency, state of emergency, or local emergency, as those terms are defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(c) This chapter shall not apply to a renewal of a contract if the employees performing the services are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that is governed by the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22178.

(a) This chapter shall apply to any contracts with a value of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and to any contracts with a person or entity, or related person or entity, with a cumulative value of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) within the fiscal year of the city, county, city and county, or special district, being negotiated between the city, county, city and county, or special district, and any person or entity that seeks to provide services or goods to the city, county, city and county, or special district, in the following areas: accounting, financing, hardware and software maintenance, health care, human resources, human services, information technology, telecommunications,
 janitorial maintenance, legal services, lobbying, marketing, office equipment maintenance, passenger vehicle maintenance, property leasing, public relations, public safety, social services, transportation, or waste removal.

(b) The city, county, city and county, or special district shall designate an unbiased independent auditor to review the cost of any proposed contract. The independent auditor shall prepare a report on the cost of the contract and provide the report to all parties and make it available to the public before the governing body takes any action to approve or disapprove the contract. The report shall comply with the following:

(1) The report shall include a recommendation regarding the viability of the contract, including any supplemental data upon which the
 report is based, and shall determine the fiscal impacts attributable to each term and condition of the contract.

(2) The report shall be made available to the public at least 30 days before the issue can be heard before the governing body and at least 60 days before any action to approve or disapprove the contract by the governing body.

(3) Any proposed changes to the contract after it has been approved by the governing body shall adhere to the same approval requirements as the original contract. The changes shall not go into effect until all of the requirements of this subdivision are met.

(c) The city, county, city and county, or special district shall disclose all offers and counteroffers to the public within 24 hours on
 its Internet Web site.

(d) Before approving any contract, the city, county, city and county, or special district shall release a list of names of all persons in attendance, whether in person or by electronic means, during any negotiation session regarding the contract, the date of the session, the length of the session, the location where the session took place, and any pertinent facts regarding the negotiations that occurred in that session.

(e) Representatives of the governing body shall advise the governing body of all offers, counteroffers, information, or statements of position discussed by the contracting person or entity and city, county, city and county, or special district representatives participating in negotiations regarding any contract.

(f) Each governing body member and staff members of governing body offices shall disclose publicly all verbal, written, electronic, or other communications regarding a subject matter related to the negotiations or pending negotiations they have had with any official or unofficial representative of the private entity within 24 hours after the communication occurs.

(g) A final governing body determination regarding approval of any contract shall be undertaken only after the matter has been heard at a minimum of two meetings of the governing body wherein the public has had the opportunity to review and comment on the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Transit Progressive Design-Build Contracting [22180. - 22180.11.]

22180.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that may include, but are not limited to, price, features, function, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance.

(2) A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and the objectives of the project.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or render service to the design-build entity in or about the construction
 of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services, as needed, pursuant to a design-build contract.

(d) “Design-build project” means a project using the progressive design-build construction procurement process described in this chapter.

(e) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and the individuals and other entities
 identified by the design-build entity as members of its team. Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum payment amount agreed upon by the local agency and the design-build entity for the design-build entity to finish all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(g) “Local agency” means any of the following:

(1) A transit district, included transit district, municipal operator, included municipal operator, or a consolidated agency, as described in Section 132353.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) A joint powers authority formed to
 provide transit service, or a county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050, 130050.1, or 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(3) A regional transportation agency, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 6820.

(4) A local or regional agency responsible for the construction of transit projects.

(h) “Progressive design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity that is selected through a qualifications-based selection at the earliest feasible stage of the project.

(i) “Qualifications-based selection” means the process by which the local agency solicits for services from the design-build entities and that price is not the sole factor as the basis
 of award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.1.

A local agency may procure progressive design-build contracts and use the progressive design-build contracting process described in this chapter for up to 10 public works projects in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for each project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.2.

A local agency entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the local agency relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.3.

The procurement process for progressive design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) The local agency shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to select a design-build entity to execute the project. The request for qualifications shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(1) Documentation of the size, type, and desired design character of the project and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the local agency’s needs, including the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate the design-build entity’s qualifications, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and
 any other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, and all other nonprice-related factors. The local agency may require that a preliminary cost estimate be included in the design-build entities’ responses and consider those costs in evaluating the statements of qualifications.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for qualifications.

(4) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the local agency. In preparing the standard template, the local agency may consult with the construction industry, the
 building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The template shall require the following information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the entity’s shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of the statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or have demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build
 entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the
 organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(b) (1) A design-build entity shall not be evaluated for selection unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment
 to the local agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if one or more of the following requirements are met:

(A) The local agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the local agency
 before January 1, 2023.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(c) At the close of the solicitation period, the local agency shall review the submissions. The local agency may evaluate submissions based solely upon the information provided in each design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. The local agency may also interview some or all of the design-build entities to further evaluate their qualifications for the project.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the local agency shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the local agency’s contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.4.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the local agency, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The local agency shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.5.

(a) After selecting a design-build entity based upon qualifications, the local agency may enter into a contract and direct the design-build entity to begin design and preconstruction activities sufficient to establish a guaranteed maximum price for the project.

(b) (1) Upon agreement of the guaranteed maximum price for the project, the local agency, at its sole and absolute discretion, may amend its contract with the design-build entity to contract for the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project, consistent with the guaranteed maximum price. In the event that there are unforeseen site conditions, the local
 agency may amend its contract with the design-build entity accordingly and consistent with the guaranteed maximum price, to enable the entity to complete the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(2) If the cost for completing all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project exceeds the guaranteed maximum price, the costs exceeding the guaranteed maximum price shall be the responsibility of the design-build entity. If the cost for these activities are less than the guaranteed maximum price, the design-build entity shall not be entitled to the difference between the cost and the guaranteed maximum price unless there is a prior written agreement concerning the sharing of these funds. For purposes
 of this section, cost shall include the design-build entity’s direct costs, general conditions, overhead, and fee.

(c) (1) If the local agency and the design-build entity do not reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price, or the local agency otherwise elects not to amend the design-build entity’s contract to complete the remaining work, the local agency may solicit proposals to complete the project from firms that submitted statements of qualifications pursuant to Section 22180.3. The local agency may also, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the city, county, city and county, or special district, as applicable, to do so, formally solicit proposals from other design-build entities, and the contract award shall be made on a best value basis.

(2) The